Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Part 2.
Training on Use of Electronic Voting Equipment

§ 23-15-491.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2009.

§23-15-491. [Laws, 2006, ch. 592, § 1, eff June 29, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section.)]